src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/verb-parraIVae_gt-norm.yaml
  Verb - huvkket: # BUOLLET_TV
    huvkket+V+IV+Inf: huvkket
    huvkket+V+IV+Sup: huvkátjit
    huvkket+V+IV+Ger: huvkedijn
    huvkket+V+IV+PrfPrc: huvkkám
    huvkket+V+IV+PrsPrc: huvkke
    huvkket+V+IV+Actio+Ess: huvkkemin
    huvkket+V+IV+Actio+Ela: huvkkemis
    huvkket+V+IV+VAbess: huvkek
    huvkket+V+IV+VGen: huvke
    huvkket+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: huvkáv
    huvkket+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg2: huvká
    huvkket+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl2: huvkkebihtit
    huvkket+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl3: huvkki
    huvkket+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg1: huvkkiv
    huvkket+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg2: huvkki
    huvkket+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg3: huvkij
    huvkket+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du1: huvkijma
    huvkket+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du2: huvkijda
    huvkket+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du3: huvkijga
    huvkket+V+IV+Imprt+Sg2: huvke
    huvkket+V+IV+Imprt+Sg3: huvkkis
    huvkket+V+IV+Imprt+Du1: huvkkon
    huvkket+V+IV+Imprt+Du2: huvkke
    huvkket+V+IV+Imprt+Du3: huvkkiska
    huvkket+V+IV+ImprtII+Pl1: huvkkup
    huvkket+V+IV+ImprtII+Pl2: huvkkut
    huvkket+V+IV+ImprtII+Pl3: huvkkusa
    huvkket+V+IV+Pot+Sg1: huvkitjav
    huvkket+V+IV+Pot+Sg2: huvkitja
    huvkket+V+IV+Pot+Sg3: huvkisj
    huvkket+V+IV+Pot+Pl3: huvkitji
    huvkket+V+IV+Der/Pass+V++Ind+Prs+Sg1: []
    huvkket+V+IV+Der/PassL+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg3: huvkeduvvá
    huvkket+V+IV+Cond+Sg1: huvkáluluv
    huvkket+V+IV+Cond+Pl1: huvkálulujma
    huvkket+V+IV+Cond+Pl3: huvkálulun

  Verb - biehket: # VIEDJET_IV
    biehket+V+IV+Inf: biehket
    biehket+V+IV+Sup: [bægátjit, bägátjit]
    biehket+V+IV+Ger: biegedijn
    biehket+V+IV+PrfPrc: [bæhkám, bähkám]
    biehket+V+IV+PrsPrc: biehkke
    biehket+V+IV+Actio+Ess: biehkemin
    biehket+V+IV+Actio+Ela: biehkemis
    biehket+V+IV+VAbess: biegek
    biehket+V+IV+VGen: biege
    biehket+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: [bægáv, bägáv]
    biehket+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg2: [bægá, bägá]
    biehket+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl2: biehkebihtit
    biehket+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl3: biehki
    biehket+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg1: biehkiv
    biehket+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg2: biehki
    biehket+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg3: biegij
    biehket+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du1: biegijma
    biehket+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du2: biegijda
    biehket+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du3: biegijga
    biehket+V+IV+Imprt+Sg2: biege
    biehket+V+IV+Imprt+Sg3: biehkis
    biehket+V+IV+Imprt+Du1: [bæhkon, bähkon]
    biehket+V+IV+Imprt+Du2: biehkke
    biehket+V+IV+Imprt+Du3: biehkiska
    biehket+V+IV+ImprtII+Pl1: behkup
    biehket+V+IV+ImprtII+Pl2: behkut
    biehket+V+IV+ImprtII+Pl3: behkusa
    biehket+V+IV+Pot+Sg1: biegitjav
    biehket+V+IV+Pot+Sg2: biegitja
    biehket+V+IV+Pot+Sg3: biegisj
    biehket+V+IV+Pot+Pl3: biegitji
    biehket+V+IV+Der/Pass+V++Ind+Prs+Sg1: []
    biehket+V+IV+Der/PassL+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg3: biegeduvvá
    biehket+V+IV+Cond+Sg1: [bægáluluv, bägáluluv]
    biehket+V+IV+Cond+Pl1: [bægálulujma, bägálulujma]
    biehket+V+IV+Cond+Pl3: [bægálulun, bägálulun]

  Verb - iedjet and viedjet: # VIEDJET_IV
    iedjet+V+IV+PrsPrc:     ieddje
    iedjet+V+IV+Imprt+Du2:  ieddje
    viedjet+V+IV+PrsPrc:    vieddje
    viedjet+V+IV+Imprt+Du2: vieddje


#Verb - dehkot: # VILSSJOT_IV
#    dehkot+V+IV+Inf: dehkot 
#    dehkot+V+IV+Sup: [dægotjit, dägotjit]
#    dehkot+V+IV+Ger: [dægodijn, dägodijn]
#    dehkot+V+IV+PrfPrc: dehkum
#    dehkot+V+IV+PrsPrc: [dæhkko, dähkko]
#    dehkot+V+IV+Actio+Ess: [dæhkomin, dähkomin]
#    dehkot+V+IV+Actio+Ela: [dæhkomis, dähkomis]
#    dehkot+V+IV+VAbess: [dægok, dägok]
#    dehkot+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: [dægov, dägov]
#    dehkot+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl2: dæhkobihtit
#    dehkot+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl3: dehku
#    dehkot+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg1: dehkuv
#    dehkot+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg2: dehku
#    dehkot+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg3: dægoj
#    dehkot+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du1: dægojma 
#    dehkot+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du2: dægojda
#    dehkot+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du3: dægojga
#    dehkot+V+IV+Imprt+Sg2: rævgo
#    dehkot+V+IV+Imprt+Sg3: rævggus
#    dehkot+V+IV+Imprt+Du1: rævggon 
#    dehkot+V+IV+Imprt+Du2: rævggo
#    dehkot+V+IV+Imprt+Du3: rævgguska
#    dehkot+V+IV+ImprtII+Pl1: rævggup
#    dehkot+V+IV+ImprtII+Pl2: rævggut
#    dehkot+V+IV+ImprtII+Pl3: rævggusa
#    dehkot+V+IV+Pot+Sg1: rævgotjav
#    dehkot+V+IV+Pot+Sg2: rævgotja
#    dehkot+V+IV+Pot+Sg3: rævgosj
#    dehkot+V+IV+Pot+Pl3: rævgotji
#    dehkot+V+IV+Der/PassL+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg3: rævgoduváj
#    dehkot+V+IV+Cond+Sg2: rævgolulu
#    dehkot+V+IV+Cond+Pl1: rævgolulujma
